Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.222

Training for students enrolled at institutions of higher education.

The commission may provide basic law enforcement training to students who are enrolled in criminal justice courses of study at four-year institutions of higher education, if the training is provided during the summers following the students' junior and senior years and so long as the students bear the full cost of the training.

[ 1996 c 203 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1996 c 203: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 28, 1996]." [ 1996 c 203 s 4.]